Hawaii statutes.
§425-2 Forms to be furnished by director.
The registration, annual and other statements required by this part shall be
filed on forms to be furnished by the director of commerce and consumer
affairs. [L 1969, c 247, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 270, §2; am L 1982, c 204, §8;
am L 1983, c 124, §17]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next